Utah statutes.
53A-11-603.   Administration of glucagon -- Training of volunteer school personnel -- Authority to use glucagon -- Immunity from liability.

(1)  As used in this section, "glucagon authorization" means a signed statement from a parent or guardian of a student with diabetes:

(a)  certifying that glucagon has been prescribed for the student;

(b)  requesting that the student's public school identify and train school personnel who volunteer to be trained in the administration of glucagon in accordance with this section; and

(c)  authorizing the administration of glucagon in an emergency to the student in accordance with this section.

(2) (a)  A public school shall, within a reasonable time after receiving a glucagon authorization, train two or more school personnel who volunteer to be trained in the administration of glucagon, with training provided by the school nurse or another qualified, licensed medical professional.

(b)  A public school shall allow all willing school personnel to receive training in the administration of glucagon, and the school shall assist and may not obstruct the identification or training of volunteers under this Subsection (2).

(c)  The Utah Department of Health, in cooperation with the state superintendent of public instruction, shall design a glucagon authorization form to be used by public schools in accordance with this section.

(3) (a)  Training in the administration of glucagon shall include:

(i)  techniques for recognizing the symptoms that warrant the administration of glucagon;

(ii)  standards and procedures for the storage and use of glucagon;

(iii)  other emergency procedures, including calling the emergency 911 number and contacting, if possible, the student's parent or guardian; and

(iv)  written materials covering the information required under this Subsection (3).

(b)  A school shall retain for reference the written materials prepared in accordance with Subsection (3)(a)(iv).

(4)  A public school shall permit a student or school personnel to possess or store prescribed glucagon so that it will be available for administration in an emergency in accordance with this section.

(5) (a)  A person who has received training in accordance with this section may administer glucagon at a school or school activity to a student with a glucagon authorization if:

(i)  the student is exhibiting the symptoms that warrant the administration of glucagon; and

(ii)  a licensed health care professional is not immediately available.

(b)  A person who administers glucagon in accordance with Subsection (5)(a) shall direct a responsible person to call 911 and take other appropriate actions in accordance with the training materials retained under Subsection (3)(b).

(6)  School personnel who provide or receive training under this section and act in good faith are not liable in any civil or criminal action for any act taken or not taken under the authority of this section with respect to the administration of glucagon.

(7)  Section 53A-11-601 does not apply to the administration of glucagon in accordance with this section.

(8)  Section 53A-11-904 does not apply to the possession and administration of glucagon in accordance with this section.

(9)  The unlawful or unprofessional conduct provisions of Title 58, Occupations and Professions, do not apply to a person licensed as a health professional under Title 58, Occupations and Professions, including a nurse, physician, or pharmacist who, in good faith, trains nonlicensed volunteers to administer glucagon in accordance with this section.

